Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2271
Individuals less than nineteen years of age; applicability of section.

Section 29-2270 shall not apply to individuals who pass the general education development test or who earn a high school diploma. Subdivision (2) of section 29-2270 shall not apply to an individual required to attend school pursuant to section 79-201.

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1034.